ja: クラブのサブセット: ブレードパター; フェアウェイウッド; ギャップウェッジ; ロブウェッジ; ロングアイアン; マレットパター; ミッドアイアン; ミッドマレットパター; ペリフェラルウェイトパター; ピッチングウェッジ; サンドウェッジ; ショートアイアン; トラディショナルブレードパター; ウルトラロブウェッジ; その他
hr-HR: Podskup palice za golf: Palica blade putter; Palica fairway wood; Palica gap wedge; Palica lob wedge; Palica long iron; Palica mallet putter; Palica mid iron; Palica mid mallet putter; Palica peripheral weighted putter; Palica pitching wedge; Palica sand wedge; Palica short iron; Tradicionalna palica blade putter; Palica ultra lob wedge; Ostalo
fr: Sous-ensemble de clubs: Fer droit; Bois de parcours; Gap-wedge; Lob-wedge; Fer long; Putter maillet; Fer moyen; Putter maillet moyen; Putter périphérique lesté; Pitching-wedge; Sand-wedge; Fer court; Putter à lame traditionnel; Lob-wedge ultra; Autre
nl: Clubsubset: Blade-putter; Fairway wood; Gapwedge; Lobwedge; Lang ijzer; Mallet-putter; Midden ijzer; Midden mallet-putter; Perifere gewogen putter; Pitching wedge; Zandwedge; Kort ijzer; Traditionele blade-putter; Ultralob-wedge; Andere
ko: 클럽 서브세트: 블레이드 퍼터; 페어웨이 우드; 갭 웨지; 로브 웨지; 롱 아이언; 말렛 퍼터; 미드 아이언; 미드 말렛 퍼터; 퍼리퍼럴웨이트 퍼터; 피칭 웨지; 샌드 웨지; 숏 아이언; 트래디셔널 블레이드 퍼터; 울트라 로브 웨지; 기타
tr: Sopa Alt Kümesi: Bıçak atıcı; Golf sahası ahşap; Boşluk kaması; Lob kama; Uzun demir; Tokmak atıcı; Orta demir; Orta tokmak atıcı; Çevresel ağırlıklı atıcı; Eğimli kama; Kum kaması; Kısa demir; Geleneksel bıçak atıcı; Ultra lob kama; Diğer
hu: Golfütők alkategóriái: Blade putter; Fairway faütő; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Hosszú vasütő; Mallet putter; Közepes vasütő; Közepes mallet putter; Körvonalán súlyozott putter; Pitching wedge; Sand wedge; Rövid vasütő; Hagyományos blade putter; Ultra lob wedge; Egyéb
bg-BG: Поднабор на стикове: Блейд пътър; Дърво за феъруей; Уедж Gap; Уедж Lob; Дълъг айрън; Пътър тип „малет“; Среден айрън; Среден пътър тип „малет“; Периферно претеглен пътър; Уедж за пичинг; Уедж за пясък; Къс айрън; Традиционен блейд пътър; Уедж Ultra lob; Други
it: Sottoinsieme di mazza: Putter a lama; Fairway wood; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Ferro lungo; Putter mallet; Ferro medio; Putter mallet medio; Putter con pesi periferici; Pitching wedge; Sand wedge; Ferro corto; Putter tradizionale a lama; Ultra lob wedge; Altro
sk-SK: Podkategória golfových palív: Golfový putter; Fairwayové drevo; Golfový gap wedge; Golfový lop wedge; Golfový long iron; Golfový mallet putter; Golfový mid iron; Golfový mid mallet putter; Golfový peripheral weighted putter; Golfový pitching wedge; Golfový sand wedge; Golfový short iron; Tradičný blade putter; Golfový Ultra lob wedge; Iné
ru: Подвид клюшки: Паттер с лезвием; Фэрвей вуд; Гэп-ведж; Лоб-ведж; Длинный айрон; Паттер молот; Средний айрон; Средний паттер молот; Паттер с периферическим весом; Питчинг-ведж; Сэнд-ведж; Короткий айрон; Традиционный паттер с лезвием; Ультра-лоб-ведж; Другое
zh-CN: 球杆子集: 刀片式推杆; 球道木杆; 障碍杆; 高抛挖起杆; 长铁杆; 镰刀型推杆; 中号铁杆; 中号槌型推杆; 末端加重推杆; 劈起杆; 沙坑杆; 短杆; 传统刀片式推杆; 超高挖起杆; 其他
sl-SI: Podkategorije palic: Blade putter; Fairway wood; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Dolgo železo; Mallet putter; Srednje železo; Mid mallet putter; Periferni obteženi putter; Pitching wedge; Peskovka; Kratko železo; Tradicionalni blade putter; Ultra lob wedge; Drugo
nb: Klubb undersett: Blade putter; Fairway wood; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Long iron; Mallet putter; Mid iron; Mid mallet putter; Perifer vektet putter; Pitching wedge; Sand wedge; Short iron; Tradisjonell blade putter; Ultra lob wedge; Annet
zh-TW: 高爾夫球棒子集: 刀片型推桿; 球道木桿; 中間挖起桿; 大角度挖起桿; 長鐵桿; 槌型推桿; 中鐵桿; 中槌型推桿; 外圍加重推桿; 劈起桿; 沙坑桿; 短鐵桿; 傳統刀片式推桿; 超高吊挖起桿; 其他
el: Υποκατηγορία μπαστουνιού: Blade putter; Fairway wood; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Long iron; Mallet putter; Mid iron; Mid mallet putter; Peripheral weighted putter; Pitching wedge; Sand wedge; Short iron; Traditional blade putter; Ultra lob wedge; Άλλο
lt-LT: Lazdos pogrupis: „Blade putter“ (siaura įridenimo); „Fairway wood“ lazda; „Gap wedge“ (tarpinė lazda); „Lob wedge“ (didelio aukščio ir trumpo atstumo lazda); „Long iron“ (ilgoji lazda); „Mallet putter“ (įridenimo lazda); „Mid iron“ (vidutinio ilgio); „Mid mallet putter“ (vidutinė įridenimo lazda); „Peripheral weighted putter“ (periferinė įridenimo lazda); „Pitching wedge“ (trumpų smūgių lazda); „Sand wedge“ (trumpų smūgių smėlyje lazda); „Short iron“ (trumpakotė lazda); „Traditional blade putter“ (tradicinė įridenimo lazda); „Ultra lob wedge“ (didelio aukščio ir trumpo atstumo lazda); Kita
es: Subconjunto de palos: Putter con cabeza blade; Palo de madera para el fairway; Cuña de brecha; Cuña lob; Palo de hierro largo; Putter Mallet; Palo de hierro 2; Putter Mallet medio; Putter con peso periférico; Cuña de lanzamiento; Cuña de arena; Palo de hierro corto; Putter con cabeza tradicional; Ultra lob wedge; Otros
en: Club subset: Blade putter; Fairway wood; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Long iron; Mallet putter; Mid iron; Mid mallet putter; Peripheral weighted putter; Pitching wedge; Sand wedge; Short iron; Traditional blade putter; Ultra lob wedge; Other
sv: Underset av golfklubbor: Bladputter; Fairwayträ; Gap wedge; Lobb wedge; Långt järn; Mallet putter; Medeljärn; Mallet putter; Perifer viktad putter; Pitching wedge; Sandwedge; Kort järn; Traditionell bladputter; Lobb wedge; Övrigt
fi: Kerhon alaryhmä: Blade-putteri; Väyläpuu; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Pitkä rauta; Mallet-putteri; Keskirauta; Mid mallet -putteri; Ääripäästä painotettu putteri; Pitching wedge; Sand wedge; Lyhyt rauta; Perinteinen blade-putteri; Ultra lob wedge; Muu
de: Schlägeruntergruppe: Blade-Putter; Fairwayholz; Gap-Wedge; Lob-Wedge; Langes Eisen; Mallet-Putter; Mittleres Eisen; Mid-Mallet-Putter; Putter mit peripherer Gewichtung; Pitching-Wedge; Sand-Wedge; Kurzes Eisen; Traditioneller Blade-Putter; Ultra-Lob-Wedge; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Categorii de crose: Blade putter; Fairway wood; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Long iron; Mallet putter; Mid iron; Mid mallet putter; Peripheral weighted putter; Pitching wedge; Sand wedge; Short iron; Traditional blade putter; Ultra lob wedge; Altele
cs: Podskupina golfových holí: Blade putter; Fairway wood; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Long iron; Mallet putter; Mid iron; Mid mallet putter; Peripheral weighted putter; Pitching wedge; Sand wedge; Short iron; Traditional blade putter; Ultra lob wedge; Jiné
da: Klubdelsæt: Flad putter; Fairway-kølle; Gab-jern; Lob-jern; Langt jern; Mallet-putter; Mellemjern; Mellem mallet-putter; Perifer vægtet putter; Pitching-jern; Sandjern; Kort jern; Traditionel flad putter; Ultra lob-jern; Andet
pl: Podzbiór klubowy: Putter z ostrzem; Fairway wood; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Long iron; Putter typu mallet; Mid iron; Putter typu mid mallet; Putter z obciążeniem obwodowym; Pitching wedge; Sand wedge; Short iron; Tradycyjny putter z ostrzem; Ultra lob wedge; Inne
pt-BR: Subconjunto de clube: Taco putter; Taco de madeira; Gap wedge; Lob wedge; Ferro longo; Taco mallet; Ferro médio; Taco mallet médio; Putter ponderado periférico; Pitching wedge; Sand wedge; Ferro curto; Taco putter tradicional; Ultra lob wedge; Outro
pt-PT: Subconjunto de tacos: Taco de lâmina; Madeira fairway; Cunha de abertura; Cunha de lob; Ferro comprido; Taco de martelo; Ferro médio; Taco de martelo médio; Taco com peso periférico; Cunha de lançamento; Cunha de areia; Ferro curto; Taco de lâmina tradicional; Cunha de lob ultra; Outro
th: คลับย่อย: เบลดพัตเตอร์; ไม้แฟร์เวย์; แก็ปเวดจ์; ล็อบเวดจ์; เหล็กยาว; มัลเลทพัตเตอร์; เหล็กกลาง; มัลเลทพัตเตอร์กลาง; พัตเตอร์ถ่วงน้ำหนัก; พิทชิ่งเวดจ์; แชนด์เวดจ์; เหล็กสั้น; เบลดพัตเตอร์แบบดั้งเดิม; อัลตร้าล็อบเวดจ์; อื่นๆ
vi: Nhóm gậy: Gậy Blade Putter; Gậy gỗ Fairway; Gậy Gap Wedge; Gậy Lob Wedge; Gậy sắt dài; Gậy Mallet Putter; Gậy sắt trung bình; Gậy Mid Mallet; Gậy Putter thêm khối lượng ngoại vi; Gậy Pitching Wedge; Gậy Sand Wedge; Gậy sắt ngắn; Gậy Blade Putter truyền thống; Gậy Ultra Lob Wedge; Khác